test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_I_miskweyaab_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NI - I - mskweyaap :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     mskweyaap+NI+Sg: mskweyaab
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     mskweyaap+NI+Sg+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaab, nmiskweyaabiim]
     mskweyaap+NI+Sg+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaab, gmiskweyaabiim]
     mskweyaap+NI+Sg+Px3Sg: [miskweyaab, miskweyaabiim]
     mskweyaap+NI+Sg+PxX: [miskweyaab, miskweyaabiim]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Sg: mskweyaabiinh
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Sg: mskweyaabiins
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Sg: mskweyaabiish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Sg: mskweyaabiiba
     mskweyaap+NI+Voc+Pl: mskweyaabiidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     mskweyaap+NI+Obv: mskweyaabiin
     mskweyaap+NI+Loc: mskweyaabiing
     mskweyaap+NI+Pl: mskweyaabiin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Sg+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinh, nmiskweyaabiinyim]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Sg+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiins, nmiskweyaabiinsim]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Sg+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinh, gmiskweyaabiinyim]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Sg+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiins, gmiskweyaabiinsim]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Sg+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinh, miskweyaabiinyim]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Sg+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiins, miskweyaabiinsim]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Sg+PxX: [miskweyaabiinh, miskweyaabiinyim]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Sg+PxX: [miskweyaabiins, miskweyaabiinsim]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 4]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Sg+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiish, nmiskweyaabiimish]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Sg+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiish, gmiskweyaabiimish]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Sg+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiish, miskweyaabiimish]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Sg+PxX: [miskweyaabiish, miskweyaabiimish]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 5]
     mskweyaap+NI+Sg+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinaa, nmiskweyaabiimnaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Sg+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinaa, gmiskweyaabiimnaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Sg+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiiwaa, gmiskweyaabiimwaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Sg+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiiwaa, miskweyaabiimwaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Sg+Px4: [miskweyaabiini, miskweyaabiimni]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 6]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Sg+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiiba, nmiskweyaabiimba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Voc+Pl+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiidig, nmiskweyaabiimdig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Sg+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiiba, gmiskweyaabiimba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Voc+Pl+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiidig, gmiskweyaabiimdig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Sg+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiiba, miskweyaabiimba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Voc+Pl+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiidig, miskweyaabiimdig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Sg+PxX: [miskweyaabiiba, miskweyaabiimba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Voc+Pl+PxX: [miskweyaabiidig, miskweyaabiimdig]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Obv+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiin, nmiskweyaabiiman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Loc+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiing, nmiskweyaabiiming]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pl+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiin, nmiskweyaabiiman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Obv+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiin, gmiskweyaabiiman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Loc+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiing, gmiskweyaabiiming]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pl+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiin, gmiskweyaabiiman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Obv+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiin, miskweyaabiiman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Loc+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiing, miskweyaabiiming]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pl+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiin, miskweyaabiiman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Obv+PxX: [miskweyaabiin, miskweyaabiiman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Loc+PxX: [miskweyaabiing, miskweyaabiiming]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pl+PxX: [miskweyaabiin, miskweyaabiiman]
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [2, 4]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Sg: mskweyaabiinyish
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Sg: mskweyaabiinsish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [2, 6]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Sg: mskweyaabiinyba
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: mskweyaabiinydig
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Sg: mskweyaabiinsba
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: mskweyaabiinsdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [2, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Obv: mskweyaabiinyin
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Loc: mskweyaabiinying
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pl: mskweyaabiinyin
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Obv: mskweyaabiinsan
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Loc: mskweyaabiinsing
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pl: mskweyaabiinsan
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [4, 6]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Sg: mskweyaabiishba
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: mskweyaabiishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [4, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Obv: mskweyaabiishan
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Loc: mskweyaabiishing
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Pl: mskweyaabiishan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [6, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Obv: mskweyaabiibniin
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Loc: mskweyaabiibniing
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Pl: mskweyaabiibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 4]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Sg+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinyish, nmiskweyaabiinymish]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Sg+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinsish, nmiskweyaabiinsmish]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Sg+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinyish, gmiskweyaabiinymish]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Sg+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinsish, gmiskweyaabiinsmish]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Sg+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinyish, miskweyaabiinymish]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Sg+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinsish, miskweyaabiinsmish]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Sg+PxX: [miskweyaabiinyish, miskweyaabiinymish]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Sg+PxX: [miskweyaabiinsish, miskweyaabiinsmish]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 5]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Sg+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinynaa, nmiskweyaabiinyminaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Sg+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinsnaa, nmiskweyaabiinsminaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Sg+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinynaa, gmiskweyaabiinyminaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Sg+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinywaa, gmiskweyaabiinymiwaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Sg+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsnaa, gmiskweyaabiinsminaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Sg+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinswaa, gmiskweyaabiinsmiwaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Sg+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinywaa, miskweyaabiinymiwaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Sg+Px4: [miskweyaabiinyni, miskweyaabiinymini]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Sg+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinswaa, miskweyaabiinsmiwaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Sg+Px4: [miskweyaabiinsni, miskweyaabiinsmini]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 6]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Sg+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinyba, nmiskweyaabiinymiba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Voc+Pl+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinydig, nmiskweyaabiinymidig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Sg+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinsba, nmiskweyaabiinsmiba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinsdig, nmiskweyaabiinsmidig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Sg+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinyba, gmiskweyaabiinymiba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Voc+Pl+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinydig, gmiskweyaabiinymidig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Sg+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinsba, gmiskweyaabiinsmiba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinsdig, gmiskweyaabiinsmidig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Sg+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinyba, miskweyaabiinymiba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Voc+Pl+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinydig, miskweyaabiinymidig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Sg+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinsba, miskweyaabiinsmiba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinsdig, miskweyaabiinsmidig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Sg+PxX: [miskweyaabiinyba, miskweyaabiinymiba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Voc+Pl+PxX: [miskweyaabiinydig, miskweyaabiinymidig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Sg+PxX: [miskweyaabiinsba, miskweyaabiinsmiba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl+PxX: [miskweyaabiinsdig, miskweyaabiinsmidig]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Obv+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinyin, nmiskweyaabiinyman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Loc+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinying, nmiskweyaabiinyming]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pl+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinyin, nmiskweyaabiinyman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Obv+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinsan, nmiskweyaabiinsman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Loc+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinsing, nmiskweyaabiinsming]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pl+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinsan, nmiskweyaabiinsman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Obv+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinyin, gmiskweyaabiinyman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Loc+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinying, gmiskweyaabiinyming]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pl+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinyin, gmiskweyaabiinyman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Obv+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinsan, gmiskweyaabiinsman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Loc+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinsing, gmiskweyaabiinsming]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pl+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinsan, gmiskweyaabiinsman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Obv+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinyin, miskweyaabiinyman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Loc+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinying, miskweyaabiinyming]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pl+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinyin, miskweyaabiinyman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Obv+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinsan, miskweyaabiinsman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Loc+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinsing, miskweyaabiinsming]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pl+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinsan, miskweyaabiinsman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Obv+PxX: [miskweyaabiinyin, miskweyaabiinyman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Loc+PxX: [miskweyaabiinying, miskweyaabiinyming]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pl+PxX: [miskweyaabiinyin, miskweyaabiinyman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Obv+PxX: [miskweyaabiinsan, miskweyaabiinsman]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Loc+PxX: [miskweyaabiinsing, miskweyaabiinsming]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pl+PxX: [miskweyaabiinsan, miskweyaabiinsman]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 4]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 5]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 6]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 4, 5]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Sg+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiishnaa, nmiskweyaabiimshinaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Sg+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiishnaa, gmiskweyaabiimshinaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Sg+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiishwaa, gmiskweyaabiimshiwaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Sg+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiishwaa, miskweyaabiimshiwaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Sg+Px4: [miskweyaabiishni, miskweyaabiimshini]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 4, 6]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiishba, nmiskweyaabiimshiba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiishdig, nmiskweyaabiimshidig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiishba, gmiskweyaabiimshiba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiishdig, gmiskweyaabiimshidig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiishba, miskweyaabiimshiba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiishdig, miskweyaabiimshidig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Sg+PxX: [miskweyaabiishba, miskweyaabiimshiba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl+PxX: [miskweyaabiishdig, miskweyaabiimshidig]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 4, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Obv+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiishan, nmiskweyaabiimshan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Loc+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiishing, nmiskweyaabiimshing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Pl+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiishan, nmiskweyaabiimshan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Obv+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiishan, gmiskweyaabiimshan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Loc+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiishing, gmiskweyaabiimshing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Pl+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiishan, gmiskweyaabiimshan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Obv+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiishan, miskweyaabiimshan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Loc+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiishing, miskweyaabiimshing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Pl+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiishan, miskweyaabiimshan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Obv+PxX: [miskweyaabiishan, miskweyaabiimshan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Loc+PxX: [miskweyaabiishing, miskweyaabiimshing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Pl+PxX: [miskweyaabiishan, miskweyaabiimshan]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 5, 6]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Sg+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinaanba, nmiskweyaabiimnaanba]
